North Dakota, session 69, HB1372.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new chapter to title 13 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
1. "Commissioner" means the commissioner of financial institutions.
2. "Consumer" means any individual who resides, is present, or is domiciled in this state
or who is or may become a plaintiff, claimant, or complainant in a civil action or in
pursuit of any claim or cause of action in this state.
3. "Entity" means any domestic or foreign corporation, partnership, limited partnership,
limited liability company, trust, fund, plan, or any other business, enterprise,
association, or organization of any kind or nature.
4. "Foreign country or person of concern" includes the following:
a. A foreign government or person listed in 15 CFR 791.4.
b. A country prohibited from purchasing or otherwise acquiring title to real property
in this state under section 47 - 01 - 09 .
5. "Foreign entity of concern" means a partnership, association, corporation,
organization, or other combination of persons:
a. Organized or incorporated in a foreign country of concern;
b. Owned or controlled by the government, a political subdivision, or a political party
of a foreign country of concern;
c. That has a principal place of business in a foreign country of concern; or
Page No. 1 25.0389.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
d. That is owned, organized, or controlled by or affiliated with a foreign organization
that has been:
(a) Placed on the federal office of foreign assets control specially designated
nationals and blocked persons list (SDN list); or
(b) Designated by the United States secretary of state as a foreign terrorist
organization.
6. "Legal representative" means an attorney, group of attorneys, or law firm duly licensed
and authorized to practice law and to represent a consumer in a civil action or claim to
recover damages in this state.
7. "Litigation financer" means any individual or entity engaged in, formed, created, or
established for the purpose of engaging in the business of litigation financing or any
other business or economic activity in which the individual or entity receives a
percentage of an anticipated recovery in a civil legal action brought by a consumer,
lawyer, or law firm asserting legal claims on behalf of a consumer, in exchange for
providing litigation financing.
8. "Litigation financing" means the financing, funding, or advancing of money to pay for
expenses or any other sums arising from a civil action, claim, or cause of action, if the
financing, funding, or advancing of money is provided by any person other than a
person that is:
a. A party to the civil action, claim, or cause of action;
b. A legal representative engaged, directly or indirectly, through another legal
representative, to represent a party in the civil action, claim, or cause of action; or
c. An entity or insurer with a pre - existing contractual obligation to indemnify or
defend a party to the civil action, claim, or cause of action.
9. a. "Litigation financing contract" means a written contract in which a person agrees
to provide litigation financing to any person in conjunction with a civil action or in
pursuit of any claim or cause of action in this state in consideration for:
(1) The payment of fees or other consideration to the person providing the
litigation financing; or
(2) Granting or assigning to the person providing the litigation financing a right
to receive payment from the value of any proceeds or other consideration
Page No. 2 25.0389.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
realized from any judgment, award, settlement, verdict, or other form of
monetary relief any consumer or other person may receive or recover in
relation to the civil action, claim, or cause of action.
b. The term does not include an agreement, contract, or engagement of a legal
representative to render legal services to a consumer on a contingency fee basis,
including the advancement of legal costs by the legal representative, in which the
services or costs are provided to or on behalf of a consumer by the legal
representative representing the consumer in the civil action, claim, or cause of
action.
10. "Nationwide multistate licensing system" means the registry developed by the
conference of state bank supervisors and the American association of residential
mortgage regulators and owned and operated by the state regulatory register or any
successor or affiliated entity, for the licensing and registration of persons in financial
services industries.
11. "Regulated lender" means:
a. A bank, building and loan association, savings and loan association, trust
company, credit union, credit association, consumer loan licensee, money broker,
deferred presentment service provider, residential mortgage lender licensee,
development corporation, bank holding company, or mutual or stock insurance
company organized pursuant to state or federal statutory authority and subject to
supervision, control, or regulation by:
(1) An agency of the state; or
(2) An agency of the federal government;
b. A subsidiary of an entity described in subdivision a;
c. A state agency or a federal agency that is authorized to lend money; and
d. A corporation or other entity established by congress or the state which is owned,
in whole or in part, by the United States or the state and is authorized to lend
money.
License.
1. A person may not engage in litigation financing in this state unless the litigation
financer has received a license from the commissioner.
Page No. 3 25.0389.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
2. If the licensed litigation financer is an entity, the entity must be active and in good
standing with the secretary of state.
3. The application for a license as a litigation financer must be in writing, under oath, and
in the form prescribed by the commissioner. The application must include the following
information:
a. The legal name of the litigation financer;
b. The physical street address and mailing address of the litigation financer;
c. A telephone number or electronic mail address at which the litigation financer
may be contacted;
d. The physical street address and mailing address of the licensed financer's
licensed office and the name of the registered agent at the licensed office who is
authorized to accept service of process on behalf of the licensed financer; and
e. Any other information the commissioner considers necessary.
4. A litigation financer subject to licensure shall file an amended application within twenty
business days whenever the information contained in the most recently filed
application changes, becomes inaccurate, or incomplete in any respect.
5. The commissioner may prescribe forms to carry out this chapter, including the use of
the nationwide multistate system.
6. At the time of making an application, the applicant shall include payment of four
hundred dollars, which is not subject to refund, as a fee for investigating the
application, and four hundred dollars for the annual license fee. Fees must be
deposited in the financial institution's regulatory fund.
7. All documents and information filed with the commissioner are public records.
8. The commissioner's duty to file documents under this section is ministerial. The
commissioner's filing or refusing to file a document does not create a presumption
that:
a. The document does or does not conform to the requirements of this chapter; or
b. The information contained in the document is correct or incorrect.
9. Additional fees may be assessed to cover costs associated with the use of the
nationwide multistate licensing system.
Page No. 4 25.0389.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
Surety bond required.
1. Each licensee shall maintain a surety bond in an amount not less than fifty thousand
dollars. The surety bond must be in a form prescribed by the commissioner.
2. When an action is commenced on a licensee's bond, the commissioner may require
the filing of a new bond.
3. Immediately upon recovery upon any action on the bond, the licensee shall file a new
bond.
Minimum net worth required.
1. A minimum net worth must be maintained continuously by every licensee in
accordance with this section.
2. Minimum net worth must be maintained in the amount of twenty-five thousand dollars.
3. If the net worth of a licensee falls below the minimum net worth set forth in
subsection 1, the licensee shall provide a plan, subject to the approval of the
commissioner, to increase the licensee's net worth to an amount in conformance with
this section. Submission of a plan under this section must be made within twenty
business days of a notice from the commissioner which states the licensee is not in
compliance with subsection 1. If the licensee does not submit a plan under this
section, fails to comply with an approved plan, or has repeated violations of
subsection 1, the commissioner may revoke the license .
Expiration of licensure - Renewal.
1. Licensure under this chapter expires December thirty-first of each year.
2. Licensure may be renewed for the ensuing twelve-month period upon application and
the payment to the commissioner of the annual license fee, which is not subject to
refund, before December first of each year.
3. The form and content of renewal applications must be determined by the department
of financial institutions and a renewal application may be denied on the same grounds
as would justify denial of an initial application.
4. If a licensee has been delinquent in renewing the licensee's license, the department
may charge an additional fee of fifty dollars for the renewal of the license.
5. The commissioner may deny an application to renew a license if the licensee no
longer meets the criteria for licensure or otherwise fails to comply with this chapter.
Page No. 5 25.0389.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
Response to department requests.
An applicant, licensee, or other person subject to this chapter shall comply with requests for
information, documents, or other requests from the department of financial institutions within the
time specified in the request, which must be a minimum of ten days, or, if no time is specified,
within thirty days of the request by the department of financial institutions. If the request for
information is in regard to a new application or renewal of an existing application and is not
received within the time specified in the request, the department may deny the application.
Revocation of license - Suspension of license - Surrender of license.
1. The commissioner may issue upon any licensee an order suspending or revoking a
licensee's license if the commissioner finds:
a. The licensee has failed to pay the annual license fee under this chapter or any
examination fee imposed by the commissioner under the authority of this chapter.
b. The licensee, either knowingly or without the exercise of due care to prevent the
same, has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule or order lawfully
made under the authority of this chapter.
c. Any fact or condition existing at the time of the original application for the license
which clearly would have warranted the department of financial institutions in
refusing originally to issue the license.
d. The licensee has failed to maintain the required bond.
e. The licensee has failed to maintain registration with the secretary of state if so
required.
2. The order must contain a notice of opportunity for hearing under chapter 28 - 32 .
3. If no hearing is requested within twenty days of the date the order is served upon the
licensee, the order is final. If a hearing is held and the commissioner finds that the
record so warrants, the commissioner may enter a final order. The final order is final
suspending or revoking the license.
4. If the commissioner finds that probable cause for revocation of any license exists and
that enforcement of the chapter requires immediate suspension of the license pending
investigation, the commissioner may enter an order suspending the license for a
period not exceeding the time required to serve upon the licensee written notice plus
sixty days, pending the holding of a hearing as prescribed in this chapter.
Page No. 6 25.0389.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
5. Any licensee may surrender the licensee's license by providing the department of
financial institutions with written notice of its surrender, but the surrender does not
affect the licensee's civil or criminal liability for acts committed before the surrender of
the license.
Suspension and removal of money broker officers and employees.
1. The commissioner of financial institutions may issue upon a current or former litigation
financing officer or employee and upon the licensee involved an order stating:
a. That the current or former officer or employee is engaging or has engaged in any
of the following conduct:
(1) Violating a law, rule, order, or written agreement with the commissioner.
(2) Engaging in harassment or abuse, the making of false or misleading
representations, or engaging in unfair practices involving litigation financing
activity.
(3) Performing an act of commission or omission or practice that is a breach of
trust or a breach of fiduciary duty.
b. The term of the suspension or removal from employment and participation within
the conduct or the affairs of a financial corporation, financial institution, credit
union, or any other entity licensed by the department of financial institutions.
2. The order must contain a notice of opportunity for hearing under chapter 28 - 32 .
3. If a hearing is not requested within twenty days of the date the order is served, the
order is final. If a hearing is held and the commissioner finds that the record so
warrants, the commissioner may enter a final order.
4. A contested or default suspension or removal order is effective immediately upon
issuance on the current or former officer or employee and upon the licensee. A
consent order is effective as agreed. Any current or former officer or employee
suspended or removed from employment and participation within the conduct or the
affairs of a licensee under this section is not eligible, while under suspension or
removal, to be employed or otherwise participate in the affairs of any financial
corporation, financial institution, credit union, or any other entity licensed by the
department of financial institutions.
Page No. 7 25.0389.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
5. When any current or former officer or employee, or other person participating in the
conduct of the affairs of a licensee is charged with a felony in state or federal court
which involves dishonesty or breach of trust, the commissioner may immediately
suspend the individual from office or prohibit the individual from further participation in
the affairs of the licensee, or both. The order is effective immediately upon issuance of
the order on the licensee and the individual charged, and remains in effect until the
criminal charge is finally disposed of or until modified by the commissioner. If a
judgment of conviction, federal pretrial diversion, conviction or agreement to plea to
lesser charges, or similar state order or judgment is entered, the commissioner may
order the suspension or prohibition be made permanent. A finding of not guilty or other
disposition of the charge does not preclude the commissioner from pursuing
administrative or civil remedies.
Litigation financing protections.
1. A litigation financer may not:
a. Accept any commissions, referral fees, rebates, or other forms of consideration
from any person rendering any services to the consumer;
b. Receive or recover any payment that exceeds thirty-six percent of the amount of
any judgment, award, settlement, verdict, or other form of monetary relief
obtained in the civil action, claim, or cause of action that is the subject of the
litigation contract;
c. Advertise false or misleading information regarding its products or services;
d. Refer or require any consumer to hire or engage any person providing any goods
or rendering any services to the consumer;
e. Fail to promptly deliver a fully completed and signed litigation financing contract
to the consumer and the consumer's legal representative;
f. Attempt to secure a remedy or obtain a waiver of any remedy, including
compensatory, statutory, or exemplary damages, which the consumer may or
may not be entitled to pursue or recover otherwise;
g. Offer or provide legal advice to the consumer;
h. Assign a litigation financing contract in whole or in part;
Page No. 8 25.0389.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
i. Report a consumer to a credit reporting agency if insufficient funds remain to
repay the litigation financer in full from the proceeds received from any judgment,
award, settlement, verdict, or other form of monetary relief obtained in the civil
action, claim, or cause of action that is the subject of the litigation financing
contract; and
j. Demand, request, receive, or exercise any right to influence, affect, or otherwise
make any decision in the handling, conduct, administration, litigation, settlement,
or resolution of any civil action, claim, or cause of action in which the litigation
financer has provided litigation financing. All rights remain solely with the
consumer and the consumer's legal representative.
k. Knowingly enter an agreement creating a right for anyone, other than the named
parties, counsel of record, or law firm of record, to receive or make any payment
that is contingent on the outcome of a claim, or cause of action, the terms of
which are to be satisfied by funds directly sourced, in whole or in part, from a
foreign entity of concern.
l. A litigation financier may not enter a commercial litigation financing contract
directly or indirectly with a foreign entity of concern or a foreign country or person
of concern.
2. A legal representative who renders any services to the consumer may not have a
financial interest in litigation financing and may not receive any commissions, referral
fees, rebates, or other forms of consideration from any litigation financer or the
litigation financer's employees, owners, or affiliates.
Litigation financing contract - Disclosures.
1. The terms and conditions of a litigation financing contract must be set forth in a fully
completed written contract with no terms or conditions omitted.
2. The litigation financing contract must identify who is responsible for paying the
litigation financer, the source the funds, and when the funds are to be paid to the
litigation financer.
3. The litigation financing contract must state the amount of funding to be provided to the
consumer and the future amounts owed to the litigation financer or the method of
calculating the amounts owed to the litigation financer.
Page No. 9 25.0389.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
4. The litigation financing contract must reflect all costs and fees and must show the
maximum amount a litigation financer may own of the consumer's recovery.
5. On execution of a litigation financing contract, a litigation financer may not amend the
terms or conditions of the litigation financing contract without full disclosure to and the
prior written consent of all parties to the litigation financing contract.
6. A litigation financing contract must set forth the name, physical street address, and
mailing address of the litigation financer in the litigation financing contract.
7. A litigation financing contract must contain the following disclosures that constitute
material terms and conditions of the litigation financing contract and must be typed in
at least fourteen-point boldface type and be placed clearly and conspicuously
immediately above the consumer's signature line in the litigation financing contract:
IMPORTANT DISCLOSURES -- PLEASE READ CAREFULLY
1. Right to Cancellation: You may cancel this litigation financing contract without
penalty or further obligation within five (5) business days from the date you sign
this contract or the date you receive financing from the litigation financer,
whichever date is later. You may cancel by sending a notice of cancellation to the
litigation financer and returning to the litigation financer any funds received from
the litigation financer at the litigation financer's address set forth in this contract.
2. The maximum amount the litigation financer may receive or recover from any
contingent payment may not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount of
any judgment, award, settlement, verdict, or other form of monetary relief
obtained in the civil action, claim, or cause of action that is the subject of this
litigation contract.
3. The litigation financer agrees that it has no right to, and will not demand, request,
receive, or exercise any right to, influence, affect, or otherwise make any decision
in the handling, conduct, administration, litigation, settlement, or resolution of
your civil action, claim, or cause of action. All of these rights remain solely with
you and your legal representative.
4. If there is no recovery of any money from your civil action, claim, or cause of
action, or if there is not enough money to satisfy in full the portion assigned to the
litigation financer, you will not owe anything to the litigation financer.
Page No. 10 25.0389.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
5. You are entitled to a fully completed contract with no terms or conditions omitted
prior to signing. Before signing this contract, you should read the contract
completely and consult an attorney.
8. If the consumer is represented by a legal representative in the civil action, claim, or
cause of action that is the subject of the litigation financing contract, the consumer
must provide the litigation funding contract to the consumer's legal representative.
Upon receipt, the legal representative shall acknowledge in the contract that the legal
representative and the legal representative's employer and employees have not
received or paid a referral fee or any other consideration from or to the litigation
financer and have no obligation to do so in the future.
Litigation financing contracts - Service .
1. If a party or party's attorney initiates a civil action and is a party to a litigation financing
agreement, the party or party's attorney shall serve a copy of the litigation financing
contract with the complaint.
2. If a party or party's attorney is served with a litigating financing contract, the person
shall serve a copy of any insurance policy relevant to the civil action to the other party
within fourteen days.
3. If either party in a civil action enters a litigation financing agreement after the
commencement of the civil action, the party shall serve a copy of the agreement on
the other party within fourteen days.
Exemptions.
This chapter does not apply to the following:
1. A nonprofit entity that provides litigation financing, directly or indirectly, for the benefit
of the nonprofit or one or more of its members without receiving, in consideration for
the litigation financing:
a. The payment of interest, fees, or other consideration; or
b. Except for in-house counsel of the nonprofit, any right to recovery or payment
from the amount of a judgment, award, settlement, verdict, or other form of
monetary relief obtained in the civil action, claim, or cause of action;
2. A regulated lender that does not receive, in consideration for loaning money to any
person, a right to receive payment from the value of any proceeds or other
Page No. 11 25.0389.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
consideration realized from a judgment, award, settlement, verdict, or other form of
monetary relief a person may receive or recover in relation to a civil action, claim, or
cause of action.
Class actions.
1. This chapter applies to any civil action filed or certified as a class action in which
litigation financing is provided.
2. In addition to the disclosure requirements set forth in this chapter, the legal
representative of the putative class shall disclose to all putative class members, any
relationship between the legal representative and the litigation financer.
3. A class member is entitled to receive from the class counsel a true and correct copy of
the litigation financing contract on request.
Regulatory oversight - Rulemaking - Records.
1. The department of financial institutions shall administer and enforce this chapter. The
department may adopt rules reasonably necessary to carry out this chapter, in
accordance with chapter 28 - 32. Any hearing held and any orders issued under this
chapter must be in accordance with chapter 28 - 32. In addition to those powers se t
forth in chapter 28 - 32, the department has additional powers as set forth in this
chapter.
2 Insofar as consistent with the provisions of law, the department of financial institutions
may:
a. Determine the qualifications of all applicants based on financial responsibility,
financial condition, business experience, character, and general fitness which
must reasonably warrant the belief that the applicant's business will be conducted
lawfully and fairly. In determining whether this qualification is met, and for the
purpose of investigating compliance with the chapter, the commissioner may
review and consider the relevant business records and capital adequacy of the
applicant and the competence, experience, integrity, and financial ability of an
individual who is a member, partner, director, officer, or twenty-five percent or
more shareholder of the applicant.
b. Establish codes of ethical conduct for licensees.
Page No. 12 25.0389.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
3 Every licensee licensed under this chapter shall keep a record of all sums collected by
the licensee and of litigation financing completed as a result of the licensee's efforts
for six years from the date of last entry. The records of a licensee may be maintained
electronically if the records can be reproduced upon request by the department of
financial institutions and within the required statutory time period provided in this
section. When a licensee ceases operations for any reason, the licensee shall inform
the department of the location of the records. In addition, the licensee shall provide the
name of the individual responsible for maintenance of the records.
4 When it appears to the department of financial institutions either upon complaint or
otherwise, that any person has engaged in, is engaging in, or is about to engage in
any act or practice or transaction prohibited by this chapter, or by any order of the
department issued under this chapter or which is declared to be illegal in this chapter,
the department may:
a. Issue any order that is effective upon issuance, including cease and desist, stop,
and suspension orders, which the department deems necessary or appropriate in
the public interest or for the protection of the public; provided, however, that any
person aggrieved by an order issued under this subsection may request a
hearing before the department if the request is made within ten days after receipt
of the order. The hearing and any appeal of the hearing must be held in
accordance with chapter 28 - 32 .
b. Apply to the district court of Burleigh County, for an injunction restraining the
person and the agents, employees, partners, officers, and directors of the person
from continuing the act, practice, or transaction and for the other relief the facts
may warrant. In any proceeding for an injunction, the department may apply for
and on due showing be entitled to have issued the court's subpoena requiring the
appearance of any defendants and their agents, employees, partners, officers, or
directors, and the production of the documents, books, and records as may
appear necessary for the hearing upon the petition for an injunction. Upon proof
of any of the offenses described in this section, the court may grant the injunction
as the facts may warrant. The court may not require the department to post a
bond.
Page No. 13 25.0389.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
Investigations, subpoenas, and examination authority.
In addition to any authority allowed under this chapter, the commissioner may conduct
investigations and examinations as follows:
1. The department of financial institutions:
a. May make the public or private investigation or examination within or outside this
state as it deems necessary to determine whether any person has violated or is
about to violate any provision of this chapter or any rule or order, or to aid in the
enforcement of this chapter or in the prescribing of rules and forms under this
chapter. The licensee shall pay an investigation or examination fee and must be
charged by the department of financial institutions at an hourly rate to be set by
the commissioner, sufficient to cover all reasonable expenses of the department
associated with the visitation provided for by this section. Fees must be
deposited in the financial institutions regulatory fund.
b. May require or permit any person to file a statement in writing, under oath, or
otherwise as the department determines, as to all the facts and circumstances
concerning the matter to be investigated or examined.
c. May publish information concerning any violation of this chapter or any rule or
order under the chapter.
2. For the purpose of any investigation, examination, or proceeding under this chapter,
the department of financial institutions may administer oaths and affirmations,
subpoena witnesses, compel the attendance of witnesses, take evidence, and require
the production of any books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, or
other documents or records the department deems relevant or material to the inquiry.
3. In the case of a failure or refusal to obey a subpoena issued to any person, the district
court, upon application by the department of financial institutions, may issue to the
person an order requiring the person to appear before the department, to produce
documentary evidence if so ordered, or to give evidence touching the matter in
question under investigation or examination. Failure to obey the order of the court may
be punished by the court as a contempt of court.
4. An individual is not excused from attending and testifying or from producing any
document or record before the department of financial institutions, or in obedience to
Page No. 14 25.0389.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
the subpoena of the department, or in any proceeding instituted by the department, on
the grounds that the testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, required of the
individual may tend to incriminate the individual or subject the individual to a penalty
forfeiture; but no individual may be prosecuted or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture
for or on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which the individual is
compelled, after claiming the privilege against self-incrimination, to testify or produce
evidence, documentary or otherwise, except that the individual testifying is not exempt
from prosecution and punishment for perjury or contempt committed in testifying.
5. For purposes of initial licensing, license renewal, license suspension, license
conditioning, license revocation or termination, or general or specific inquiry or
investigation to determine compliance with this chapter, the commissioner may
access, receive, and use any books, accounts, records, files, documents, information,
or evidence, including:
a. Criminal, civil, and administrative history information, including nonconviction
data;
b. Personal history and experience information, including independent credit reports
obtained from a consumer reporting agency described under the Fair Credit
Reporting Act [15 U.S.C. 1681a]; and
c. Any other documents, information, or evidence the commissioner deems relevant
to the inquiry or investigation regardless of the location, possession, control, or
custody of the documents, information, or evidence.
6. For purposes of investigating violations or complaints arising under this chapter, or for
purposes of examination, the commissioner may review, investigate, or examine any
licensee or person subject to this chapter, as often as necessary in order to carry out
the purposes of this chapter.
7. Each licensee or person subject to this chapter shall make available to the
commissioner upon request the books and records relating to the operations of the
licensee or person subject to this chapter. The commissioner shall have access to the
books and records and interview the officers, principals, mortgage loan originators,
employees, independent contractors, agents, and customers of the licensee or person
subject to this chapter concerning their business.
Page No. 15 25.0389.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
8. Each licensee or person subject to this chapter shall make or compile reports or
prepare other information as directed by the commissioner to carry out the purposes of
this section, including:
a. Accounting compilations;
b. Information lists and data concerning litigation financing transactions in a format
prescribed by the commissioner; or
c. Any other information deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this
section.
9. In making any investigation or examination authorized by this chapter, the
commissioner may control access to any documents and records of the licensee or
person under investigation or examination. The commissioner may take possession of
the documents and records or place a person in exclusive charge of the documents
and records in the place in which the records are usually kept. During the period of
control, an individual may not remove or attempt to remove any of the documents and
records except pursuant to a court order or with the consent of the commissioner.
Unless the commissioner has reasonable grounds to believe the documents or
records of the licensee have been, or are at risk of being altered or destroyed for
purposes of concealing a violation of this chapter, the licensee or owner of the
documents and records may have access to the documents or records as necessary
to conduct its ordinary business affairs.
10. To carry out the purposes of this section, the commissioner may:
a. Retain accountants or other professionals and specialists as examiners, auditors,
or investigators to conduct or assist in the conduct of examinations or
investigations;
b. Enter agreements or relationships with other government officials or regulatory
associations to improve efficiencies and reduce regulatory burden by sharing
resources, standardized or uniform methods or procedures, and documents,
records, information, or evidence obtained under this section;
c. Use, hire, contract, or employ publicly or privately available analytical systems,
methods, or software to examine or investigate the licensee, individual, or person
subject to this chapter;
Page No. 16 25.0389.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
d. Accept and rely on examination or investigation reports made by other
government officials, within or without this state; and
e. Accept audit reports made by an independent certified public accountant for the
licensee or person subject to this chapter in the course of that part of the
examination covering the same general subject matter as the audit and may
incorporate the audit report in the report of the examination, report of
investigation, or other writing of the commissioner.
11. The authority of this section remains in effect, whether a licensee or person subject to
this chapter acts or claims to act under any licensing or registration law of this state or
claims to act without the authority.
12. A licensee or person subject to investigation or examination under this section may not
knowingly withhold, abstract, remove, mutilate, destroy, or secrete any books, records,
computer records, or other information.
Act violation - Unenforceable contract.
Any violation of this chapter by the litigation financer renders the litigation financing contract
unenforceable by the litigation financer or any successor-in-interest to the litigation financing
contract.
Penalty.
1. Any person violating any provision of this chapter or any rule or order of the
department of financial institutions made under this chapter or who engages in any
act, practice, or transaction declared by any provision of this chapter to be unlawful is
guilty of a class C felony.
2. The commissioner may impose a civil money penalty not to exceed one hundred
thousand dollars for each occurrence and one thousand dollars per day for each day
the violation continues after issuance of the order against any person who violates a
law, rule, written agreement, or order under this chapter.
3. An interested party may appeal the assessment of a civil money penalty under the
provisions of chapter 28 - 32 by filing a written notice of appeal within twenty days after
service of the assessment of civil money penalties.
4. A civil money penalty collected under this section must be paid to the department of
financial institutions and deposited in the financial institution's regulatory fund.
Page No. 17 25.0389.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
Confidentiality.
1. Except as otherwise provided in Public Law 110 - 289, section 1512, the requirements
under any federal law, chapter 44 - 04, or section 6 - 01 - 07.1, regarding the privacy or
confidentiality of any information or material provided to the nationwide multistate
licensing system and registry, and any privilege arising under federal or state law,
including the rules of any federal or state court, with respect to the information or
material, continue to apply to the information or material after the information or
material has been disclosed to the nationwide multistate licensing system and registry.
Any information and material may be shared with all state and federal regulatory
officials with mortgage industry oversight authority without the loss of privilege or the
loss of confidentiality protections provided by federal law, chapter 44 - 04, or section
6 - 01 - 07.1 .
2. For these purposes, the commissioner may enter agreements or sharing
arrangements with other governmental agencies, the conference of state bank
supervisors, the American association of residential mortgage regulators, or other
associations representing governmental agencies.
3. Information or material that is subject to a privilege or confidentiality under
subsection 1 is not subject to :
a. Disclosure under any federal or state law governing the disclosure to the public of
information held by an officer or an agency of the federal government or the
respective state; or
b. Subpoena or discovery, or admission into evidence, in any administrative
process, unless with respect to any privilege held by the nationwide multistate
licensing system and registry with respect to the information or material, the
person to whom the information or material pertains waives, in whole or in part, in
that privilege.
4. The commissioner shall take all necessary steps, under any applicable law or rule, to
protect the disclosure of information or material subject to a privilege or confidentiality
under subsection 1. Records subject to a privilege or confidentiality under
subsection 1 may be required to be disclosed only pursuant to an order of the court .
Page No. 18 25.0389.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
The court ordering the disclosure shall issue a protective order to protect the
confidential nature of the records.
5. Application of chapter 44 - 04 or section 6 - 01 - 07.1, relating to the disclosure o f
confidential supervisory information or any information or material described in
subsection 1 which is inconsistent with subsection 1, is superseded by the
requirements of this section.
6. Except for provisions of chapter 6 - 08.1 that are inconsistent with this chapter, chapter
6 - 08.1 applies to all money brokers licensed under this chapter .
SECTION 2. APPLICATION. This Act applies to any civil action commenced after the
effective date of this Act.
Page No. 19 25.0389.03000